Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-732
Retired judge; temporary duty; not contribute to retirement fund; retirement benefits not affected.

A retired judge on temporary duty shall not be required to contribute to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges, and the retirement benefits of such a retired judge shall neither be increased nor decreased on account of his temporary duty.

Laws 1974, LB 832, § 4.